Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0671.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 26d. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated under section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $14,400,000.00 for 2024-2025 for reimbursements to intermediate districts as required under section 15b of the brownfield redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2665b. (2) The amounts reimbursed under subsection (1) must be used by the intermediate district only for the purposes for which the property taxes were originally levied. (3) The Michigan strategic fund and the Michigan economic development corporation shall work with the department of treasury in identifying the amount of tax revenues that are to be reimbursed under subsection (1). (4) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department of treasury shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department of treasury. (5) As used in this section, "Michigan strategic fund" means either of the following, as applicable: (a) Until the effective date of the economic development fair competition and free enterprise act, the Michigan strategic fund created under former 1984 PA 270. (b) Beginning on the effective date of the economic development fair competition and free enterprise act, the bureau of fair competition and free enterprise created in section 7 of the economic development fair competition and free enterprise act. Sec. 65. (1) From the appropriation under section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $900,000.00 for 2024-2025 for a pre-college engineering K to 12 educational program that is focused on the development of a diverse future Michigan workforce, that serves multiple communities within southeast Michigan, that enrolls pupils from multiple districts, and that received funds appropriated for this purpose in the appropriations act that provided the Michigan strategic fund budget for 2014-2015. (2) To be eligible for funding under this section, a program must have the ability to expose pupils to, and motivate and prepare pupils for, science, technology, engineering, and mathematics careers and postsecondary education with special attention given to groups of pupils who are at-risk and underrepresented in technical professions and careers. (3) As used in this section, "Michigan strategic fund" means either of the following, as applicable: (a) Until the effective date of the economic development fair competition and free enterprise act, the Michigan strategic fund created under former 1984 PA 270. (b) Beginning on the effective date of the economic development fair competition and free enterprise act, the bureau of fair competition and free enterprise created in section 7 of the economic development fair competition and free enterprise act. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 631 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.